Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3320
License holder; written confirmation of compliance.

(1) When a license holder comes into compliance with the support order as provided in section 43-3314, the department, county attorney, or authorized attorney shall provide the license holder with written confirmation that the license holder is in compliance.

(2) When a license holder comes into compliance with subpoenas and warrants relating to paternity or child support proceedings, the court of competent jurisdiction shall provide the license holder with written confirmation that the license holder is in compliance.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 158.